Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5325.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 1.20 RCW to read as follows:The Pediocactus nigrispinus, more commonly known as the basalt cactus, snowball cactus, hedgehog cactus, or Columbia plateau cactus, is hereby designated as the official cactus of the state of Washington.--- END ---